Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑41] Estates, trusts, and other
beneficial interests. (a) In this section, "estate, trust, or other
beneficial interest" means a trust, probate estate, guardianship,
conservatorship, escrow, or custodianship or a fund from which the principal
is, may become, or claims to be, entitled to a share or payment.

(b) Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with
respect to estates, trusts, and other beneficial interests shall authorize the
agent to:

(1) Accept, receive, receipt for, sell, assign,
pledge, or exchange a share in or payment from an estate, trust, or other
beneficial interest;

(2) Demand or obtain money or another thing of value
to which the principal is, may become, or claims to be, entitled by reason of
an estate, trust, or other beneficial interest, by litigation or otherwise;

(3) Exercise for the benefit of the principal a
presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the principal;

(4) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative
dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation to ascertain the meaning, validity, or effect of a deed,
will, declaration of trust, or other instrument or transaction affecting the
interest of the principal;

(5) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative
dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation to remove, substitute, or surcharge a fiduciary;

(6) Conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything
received for an authorized purpose;

(7) Transfer an interest of the principal in real
property, stocks and bonds, accounts with financial institutions or securities
intermediaries, insurance, annuities, and other property to the trustee of a
revocable trust created by the principal as settlor; and

(8) Reject, renounce, disclaim, release, or consent
to a reduction in or modification of a share in or payment from an estate,
trust, or other beneficial interest. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next